Missouri, session 2026, HB3186.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 566.150, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 566.150, to read as follows:
566.150. 1. Any person who has been found guilty of:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of section
568.020, incest; section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree;
section 573.200, use of a child in a sexual performance; section 573.205, promoting a sexual
performance by a child; section 573.023, sexual exploitation of a minor; section 573.025,
promoting child pornography; section 573.037, possession of child pornography; or section
573.040, furnishing pornographic material to minors; or
(2) Any offense in any other jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be a
violation listed in this section;

shall not knowingly be present in or loiter within five hundred feet of any real property
comprising any public park with playground equipment, a public swimming pool, athletic
complex or athletic fields if such facilities exist for the primary use of recreation for children,
any museum if such museum holds itself out to the public as and exists with the primary
purpose of entertaining or educating children under eighteen years of age, or Missouri
department of conservation nature or education center properties.
2. The first violation of the provisions of this section is a class E felony.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3186 2
3. A second or subsequent violation of this section is a class D felony.
4. Any person who has been found guilty of an offense under subdivision (1) or (2) of
subsection 1 of this section who is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian of a child under the
age of eighteen attending a program on the property of a nature or education center of the
Missouri department of conservation may receive permission from the nature or education
center manager to be present on the property with the child during the program.
5. For purposes of this section, "public swimming pool" includes a community-
based pool that is owned for the private use of five or more households, such as a
swimming pool maintained for the use of a resident of an apartment complex or housing
community and the resident's guests.
✔